New York, session 2025-2026, S9764.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 240 of the domestic relations law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (k) to read as follows: 3 (k) In determining the best interests of the child, the court shall 4 not: (1) consider the sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or 5 gender expression of the parties; or 6 (2) prohibit a party from undergoing gender reassignment. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08039-01-5